vi: Hoàn thiện bề mặt bộ số hóa: Chống chói; Bóng láng; Lì; Gương; Riêng tư; Khác
lt-LT: Skaitmeninio įrenginio paviršiaus apdaila: Apsauga nuo akinimo; Žvilgus; Matinis; Veidrodinis; Privatumas; Kita
hr-HR: Završna obrada površine digitalizatora: Protiv odsjaja; Sjajni; Mat; Ogledalo; Privatnost; Ostalo
pt-PT: Acabamento da superfície do digitalizador: Antibrilho; Brilhante; Mate; Espelho; Privacidade; Outro
ro-RO: Finisaj suprafață digitizor: Anti-orbire; Lucios; Mat; Oglindă; Cu închidere pe interior; Altele
tr: Sayısallaştırıcı yüzey kaplaması: Parlama önleyici; Parlak; Mat; Ayna; Mahremiyet; Diğer
nb: Overflatefinish på digitaliser: Antirefleks; Blank; Matt; Speil; Personvern; Annet
th: พื้นผิวดิจิไทเซอร์: ป้องกันการสะท้อน; มัมวาว; ด้าน; กระจก; ลูกบิดประตูล็อคจากด้านใน; อื่นๆ
fi: Kosketuslasin pintaviimeistely: Häikäisysuojattu; Kiiltävä; Matta; Peili; Yksityisyys; Muu
fr: Finition de surface du numériseur: Anti-reflet; Brillant; Mat; Miroir; Confidentialité; Autre
sv: Digitaliserarens ytfinish: Reflexskydd; Glansig; Matt; Spegel; Integritet; Övrigt
ko: 디지타이저 표면 마감: 눈부심 방지; 글로시; 매트; 거울; 프라이버시; 기타
en: Digitizer surface finish: Anti-glare; Glossy; Matte; Mirror; Privacy; Other
da: Overfladefinish for digitaliseringsglas: Anti-genskin; Glansfuldt; Mat; Spejl; Privatliv; Andet
sl-SI: Površinska obdelava digitalizatorja: Proti bleščanju; Sijoč; Mat; Ogledalo; Z zaklepanjem; Drugo
nl: Afwerking digitizeroppervlak: Ontspiegeld; Glanzend; Mat; Spiegel; Privacy; Andere
ja: デジタイザー表面仕上げ: 反射防止; 光沢のある; マット; ミラー; プライバシー; その他
pt-BR: Acabamento da superfície do digitalizador: Antirreflexo; Brilhoso; Fosco; Espelho; Privacidade; Outro
zh-CN: 数字化仪表面处理: 防眩光; 光面; 哑光; 镜子; 隐私门把手; 其他
hu: Digitalizáló felületi kivitele: Csillogásmentes; Fényes; Matt; Tükör; Magánszféra; Egyéb
bg-BG: Повърхностно покритие на дигитайзера: Защита от отблясъци; Гланциран; Матов; Огледало; Уединение; Други
cs: Povrchová úprava digitizéru: Ochrana proti odleskům; Lesklá; Matná; Zrcadlo; Soukromí; Jiné
de: Digitizer-Oberflächenfinish: Blendfrei; Glänzend; Matt; Spiegel; Privatsphäre; Sonstiges
it: Finitura superficiale del digitalizzatore: Antiabbagliante; Lucido; Matte; Specchio; Privacy; Altro
zh-TW: 數位板表面處理: 抗眩光; 光澤; 霧面; 鏡面; 隱私; 其他
es: Acabado de superficie del digitalizador: Antirreflejo; Brillante; Mate; Espejo; Privacidad; Otros
ru: Отделка поверхности дигитайзера: Антибликовое покрытие; Глянцевая; Матовый; Зеркальный; Приватность; Другой
el: Φινίρισμα επιφάνειας ψηφιοποιητή: Αντιθαμβωτική; Γυαλιστερό; Ματ; Καθρέφτης; Ιδιωτικότητα; Άλλο
pl: Wykończenie powierzchni digitizera: Antyodblaskowy; Lśniący; Matowy; Lustro; Prywatność; Inne
sk-SK: Povrchová úprava digitizéra: Antireflexný; Lesklý; Matný; Zrkadlový; Súkromie; Iné